Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1405
Insurance carrier; interactive mechanism on website; duties.

An insurance carrier shall establish an interactive mechanism on its publicly accessible website that enables an enrollee to request and obtain from the insurance carrier information on the payments made by the insurance carrier to network providers for health care services. The interactive mechanism must allow an enrollee seeking information about the cost of a particular health care service to compare costs among network providers.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 15.